Illinois, session 104th, HB4924.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 3-100 and 63-811 as follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/3-100)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-100)8    Sec. 3-100. Jurisdiction over involuntary admissions. (a) 9The circuit court has jurisdiction under this Chapter over 10persons not charged with a felony who are:11        (1) subject to involuntary admission on an inpatient 12    basis as defined in Section 1-119; or . 13        (2) in need of treatment under Section 2-107.1. 14    (b) The circuit court has jurisdiction over all persons 15who are subject to involuntary admission on an outpatient 16basis under Article VII-A of this Chapter. This subsection (b) 17is inoperative on and after January 1, 2030. 18    (c) Inmates of penal institutions shall not be considered 19as charged with a felony within the meaning of this Chapter. 20Court proceedings under Article VIII of this Chapter may be 21instituted as to any such inmate at any time within 90 days 22prior to discharge of such inmate by expiration of sentence or 23otherwise, and if such inmate is found to be subject to   HB4924- 2 -LRB104 18178 KTG 31617 b1involuntary admission, the order of the court ordering 2hospitalization or other disposition shall become effective at 3the time of discharge of the inmate from penal custody. 4    (d) The circuit court has jurisdiction over all persons 5alleged to be in need of treatment under Section 2-107.1 of 6this Code, whether or not they are charged with a felony. 7(Source: P.A. 104-217, eff. 1-1-26.) 8    (405 ILCS 5/3-811)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-811)9    Sec. 3-811. Involuntary admission; alternative mental 10health facilities. 11    (a) If any person is found subject to involuntary 12admission on an inpatient basis, the court shall consider 13alternative mental health facilities which are appropriate for 14and available to the respondent, including but not limited to 15hospitalization. The court may order the respondent to undergo 16a program of hospitalization in a mental health facility 17designated by the Department, in a licensed private hospital 18or private mental health facility if it agrees, or in a 19facility of the United States Veterans Administration if it 20agrees. If any person is found subject to involuntary 21admission on an outpatient basis, the court may order the 22respondent to undergo a program of alternative treatment; or 23the court may place the respondent in the care and custody of a 24relative or other person willing and able to properly care for 25him or her. The court shall order the least restrictive   HB4924- 3 -LRB104 18178 KTG 31617 b1alternative for treatment which is appropriate. Except as 2provided in the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, no 3respondent who has pending felony charges may be ordered to 4undergo a program of hospitalization in a mental health 5facility operated by the Department unless the Department 6agrees to the program of hospitalization. 7    (b) Whenever a person is found subject to involuntary 8admission on an inpatient or outpatient basis, notice shall be 9provided to the petitioner, orally and in writing, of his or 10her right to receive notice of the recipient's discharge 11pursuant to Section 3-902(d). 12    (c) An order that a person is found subject to involuntary 13admission on an inpatient basis does not eliminate any 14obligations under the federal Emergency Medical Transport and 15Active Labor Act (EMTALA) of the transferring facility toward 16the receiving facility. Before implementing an order, the 17transferring facility shall notify the receiving facility of 18the recipient and obtain medical clearance for the recipient. 19(Source: P.A. 96-570, eff. 1-1-10; 96-1399, eff. 7-29-10; 2096-1453, eff. 8-20-10; 97-130, eff. 7-14-11.)